en: Boot type: Full chaps; Half chaps; Hard boot; Reinforced boot; Semi-soft boot; Soft boot; Other
th: ประเภทรองเท้าบูท: กางเกงหนังที่ไม่มีส่วนก้นแบบเต็มตัว; กางเกงหนังที่ไม่มีส่วนก้นแบบครึ่งตัว; รองเท้าบูตแข็ง; รองเท้าบูตเสริมความแข็งแรง; รองเท้าบูตกึ่งนุ่ม; รองเท้าบูตนุ่ม; อื่นๆ
sv: Kängtyp: Hela chaps; Halva chaps; Hård stövel; Förstärkt stövel; Halvmjuk stövel; Mjuk stövel; Övrigt
hr-HR: Vrsta čizama: Visoke jahaće čizme; Poluvisoke jahaće čizme; Čvrste čizme; Pojačane čizme; Polumeke čizme; Meke čizme; Ostalo
ro-RO: Tip cizmă: Full chaps; Half chaps; Cizmă rigidă; Cizmă ranforsată; Cizmă semi-moale; Cizmă moale; Altele
pt-BR: Tipo de bota: Chaparejos completos; Chaparejos médios; Bota rígida; Bota reforçada; Bota semimacia; Bota macia; Outro
sk-SK: Typ zavedenia operačného systému: Chapsy; Minichapsy; Pevné čižmy; Vystužené čižmy; Polomäkké čižmy; Mäkké čižmy; Iné
zh-CN: 靴子类型: 全护套; 半护套; 硬启动; 加强启动; 半软启动; 软启动; 其他
es: Tipo de bota: Con polainas completas; Con medias polainas; Bota dura; Bota reforzada; Bota semiblanda; Bota suave; Otros
cs: Typ boty: Vysoké chrániče; Poloviční chrániče; Tvrdá bota; Vyztužená bota; Poloměkká bota; Měkká bota; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип стартиране: Цели чапси; Половин чапси; Твърд ботуш; Подсилен ботуш; Полумек ботуш; Мека ботуш; Други
lt-LT: Aulinių batų tipas: Ilgaauliai; Pusiauliniai; Pakietintas batas; Darbo batas; Pusminkštės odos batai; Minšti batai; Kita
it: Tipo di stivale: Capitoli completi; Capitoli a metà; Stivale rigido; Stivale rinforzato; Stivale semimorbido; Stivale morbido; Altro
nl: Opstarttype: Volledige chaps; Halve chaps; Harde laars; Versterkte laars; Halfzachte laars; Zachte laars; Andere
de: Schuhtyp: Stiefel mit Chaps; Stiefel mit halben Chaps; Hardboot; Verstärkter Stiefel; Halbweicher Stiefel; Softboot; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Vrsta škornjev: Usnjene hlače Chaps; Usnjene/neoprenske hlače Chaps; Trd škorenj; Ojačani škorenj; Polmehki škorenj; Mehki škorenj; Drugo
ru: Тип ботинка: Высокие чапы; Низкие чапы; Жесткий ботинок; Усиленный ботинок; Полумягкий ботинок; Мягкий ботинок; Другое
ja: ブーツの種類: フルチャップス; ハーフチャップス; ハードブーツ; 強化ブーツ; セミソフトブーツ; ソフトブーツ; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de botas: Bota perneira completa; Bota perneira; Patins duros; Patins reforçados; Patins semissuaves; Patins suaves; Outro
tr: Çizme Türü: Tam kovboy botu; Yarım kovboy botu; Sert bot; Güçlendirilmiş bot; Yarı yumuşak bot; Yumuşak bot; Diğer
ko: 부츠 유형: 풀 챕스; 하프 챕스; 하드 부츠; 보강 부츠; 세미 소프트 부츠; 소프트 부츠; 기타
pl: Typ rozruchu: Pełne czapsy; Półczapsy; Twardy but; Wzmocniony but; Półmiękki but; Miękki but; Inne
zh-TW: 靴型: 皮褲; 長靴; 軍靴; 強化軍靴; 短筒皮靴; 短靴; 其他
da: Støvletype: Fuldt overtræk; Halvt overtræk; Hård støvle; Forstærket støvle; Halvblød støvle; Blød støvle; Andet
nb: Støveltype: Fulle støvler; Halve støvler; Hard støvel; Forsterket støvel; Halvmyk støvel; Myk støvel; Annet
vi: Loại ủng: Toàn chap; Nửa chap; Khởi động cứng; Khởi động gia cố; Khởi động nửa mềm; Khởi động mềm; Khác
el: Τύπος μπότας: Δερμάτινες γκέτες μέχρι το γόνατο; Δερμάτινες γκέτες μέχρι τη γάμπα; Σκληρή μπότα; Ενισχυμένη μπότα; Ημιμαλακή μπότα; Μαλακή μπότα; Άλλο
fi: Saapastyyppi: Täydet suojalahkeet; Puolisuojalahkeet; Turvakengät; Vahvistettu saapas; Puolipehmeä saapas; Pehmeä saapas; Muu
hu: Bakancs típusa: Lábszárvédők; Rövid lábszárvédők; Kemény bakancs; Megerősített bakancs; Félpuha bakancs; Puha bakancs; Egyéb
fr: Type de chaussure: Chaps complets; Demi-chaps; Démarrage dur; Bords renforcés; Botte semi-souple; Démarrage souple; Autre